apertium-ur-hi.ur.dix
    <pardef n="اذیت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="حیوان__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="کرتوت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="مصلحت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/آخِر__n">
      <e>       <p><l>آخِر</l><r>آخِر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>آخِر</l><r>آخِر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>اَواخِر</l><r>آخِر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>اَواخِر</l><r>آخِر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ضیافت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>اں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="علت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="آفت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="لالٹین"><i>لالٹین</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="طرز"><i>طرز</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="درگاہ"><i>درگاہ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خواہش"><i>خواہش</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ست"><i>ست</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جاگ"><i>جاگ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جلد"><i>جلد</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈانٹ"><i>ڈانٹ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخرت"><i>آخرت</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آسائش"><i>آسائش</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کِتاب"><i>کِتاب</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فوج"><i>فوج</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تقریر"><i>تقریر</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دوپہر"><i>دوپہر</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خوراک"><i>خوراک</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نیند"><i>نیند</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رپورٹ"><i>رپورٹ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چیل"><i>چیل</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دھاڑ"><i>دھاڑ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اُمید"><i>اُمید</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کلاشنکوف"><i>کلاشنکوف</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چیز"><i>چیز</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خیر"><i>خیر</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گونج"><i>گونج</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مصلحت"><i>مصلحت</i><par n="مصلحت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قرارداد"><i>قرارداد</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈھیل"><i>ڈھیل</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تار"><i>تار</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ترکیب"><i>ترکیب</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخِر"><i></i><par n="/آخِر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ٹائل"><i>ٹائل</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ہڑتال"><i>ہڑتال</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ضیافت"><i>ضیافت</i><par n="ضیافت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چڑیل"><i>چڑیل</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قِسم"><i>قِسم</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کھجور"><i>کھجور</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چونچ"><i>چونچ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="طلاق"><i>طلاق</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رونق"><i>رونق</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="میم"><i>میم</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اماں"><i>اماں</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تعطیل"><i>تعطیل</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شَفْقَت"><i>شَفْقَت</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بھڑ"><i>بھڑ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فکر"><i>فکر</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کمر"><i>کمر</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جیل"><i>جیل</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فضیحت"><i>فضیحت</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="زمین"><i>زمین</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پراپوزیشن"><i>پراپوزیشن</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قمیض"><i>قمیض</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="لکیر"><i>لکیر</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رکھت"><i>رکھت</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بدولت"><i>بدولت</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تصویر"><i>تصویر</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شکن"><i>شکن</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اذیت"><i>اذیت</i><par n="اذیت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تدبیر"><i>تدبیر</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بنیان"><i>بنیان</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="علت"><i>علت</i><par n="علت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بندوق"><i>بندوق</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پرچ"><i>پرچ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="زلف"><i>زلف</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گانٹھ"><i>گانٹھ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دست"><i>دست</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ٹیپ"><i>ٹیپ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کنیز"><i>کنیز</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ہفت"><i>ہفت</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شمشیر"><i>شمشیر</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آفت"><i>آفت</i><par n="آفت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="برج"><i>برج</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="منزل"><i>منزل</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="داستان"><i>داستان</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پُرکھ"><i>پُرکھ</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حیوان"><i>حیوان</i><par n="حیوان__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جاسکت"><i>جاسکت</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کرتوت"><i>کرتوت</i><par n="کرتوت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خوشامد"><i>خوشامد</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کونپل"><i>کونپل</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ٹیک"><i>ٹیک</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سلاد"><i>سلاد</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="یادگار"><i>یادگار</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پنسل"><i>پنسل</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پہنت"><i>پہنت</i><par n="ت__n"/></e>
